North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-03 Licenses and Permits
20.1-03-11.
License to hunt big game required — Limitations on licenses.

An individual may not hunt, kill, take, or attempt to take any big game without having the appropriate big game hunting license and a locking seal bearing a number corresponding to the number of the big game hunting license or stamp. The locking seal must be issued as an integral part of the big game hunting license. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual may not apply for or be issued a big game hunting license unless that individual’s fourteenth or subsequent birthday occurs in the same year as the respective big game hunting season. This age limitation does not apply to applicants for big game licenses for hunting by bow and arrow. Each violation of this section is a distinct and separate offense. The following provisions govern youth deer and antelope hunting:

An individual whose eleventh, twelfth, or thirteenth birthday occurs in the same year as a youth deer hunting season is entitled to receive a statewide white-tailed antlerless deer permit but may hunt only in that youth deer hunting season.

An individual whose twelfth or thirteenth birthday occurs in the same year as an antelope hunting season is entitled to apply for an antelope permit for that season.

An individual hunting under subdivision a or b must be accompanied by the individual’s parent, guardian, or other individual authorized by the individual’s parent or guardian. As used in this section, “accompanied” means to stay within a distance that permits uninterrupted visual contact and unaided verbal communication.

The number of licenses issued, including those licenses issued without charge under the provisions of this section, may not exceed the number of licenses authorized by the governor’s proclamation issued pursuant to section 20.1-08-04.

An individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate that hold title to at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land is eligible to submit one application for a license to hunt deer without charge, or if the individual named to receive the license is a nonresident, upon payment of the fee required for a nonresident big game license.

A resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate that has executed a lease for at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land and that actively farms or ranches that land is eligible to submit one application for a license to hunt deer without charge. Upon request, a lessee shall provide proof the land described in the completed application is leased for agricultural purposes. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license. An individual issued a license under this subsection must be a resident.

Applications must include a legal description of the eligible land, must be within a unit open for the hunting of deer, and must be signed. A license issued under this subsection is valid for the deer bow, deer gun, and muzzleloader seasons until filled and only upon the land described in the application.

If the eligible applicant in subdivisions a and b is a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, only one license may be issued and the license must be issued in the name of an individual shareholder, member, partner, beneficiary, or holder of a life estate.

An individual who is eligible for a license under subsections a and b may transfer that eligibility for the license to a spouse or legal dependent residing customarily with that individual. An individual may be eligible for only one license. No more than one license may be issued under this subsection for all qualifying land. An individual transferring eligibility under this subsection may not receive a license under subsections a and b for seasons for which the eligibility was transferred.

An individual, that individual’s spouse, and their children who have a license issued under subsections a and b may hunt together on land described in any of the applications making them eligible for the license. Family members hunting together under this provision must hunt within the same unit within which the land described in the application making them eligible for the license is located.

Applications for license issued under subsections a, b, and f received by the game and fish department on or before the date of the application deadline for deer gun lottery will be issued as any legal deer. Applications for license issued under subsections a, b, and f received by the game and fish department after the application deadline will be issued based on licenses available.

One percent of the total deer licenses and permits to hunt deer with guns to be issued in any unit or subunit as described in the governor’s proclamation, including licenses issued to nonresidents under subsection 3, must be allocated for nonresidents. Notwithstanding the number of licenses allocated under this subsection, upon payment of the fee requirement for a nonresident who participates on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer licenses remaining after the second lottery for residents, a nonresident may participate on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer licenses remaining after the second lottery for residents.

A resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, and has executed a lease for at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land that the resident actively farms or ranches; or a resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, and holds title to at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land, is eligible to submit one application for a license to hunt antelope without charge upon filing a signed application describing that land. The land must be within a unit open for the hunting of antelope. The license must include a legal description of the eligible land described in the completed application and may be used to hunt antelope only upon that land. Upon request, a lessee shall provide proof that the land described in the completed application is leased for agricultural purposes. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license. An individual licensed under this subsection must be a resident.

If the eligible applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, only one license may be issued, and the license must be issued in the name of an individual shareholder, member, partner, beneficiary, or holder of a life estate.

A resident who is eligible for a license under this subsection may transfer that eligibility for the license to a spouse or legal dependent residing customarily with the resident, but no more than one license may be issued under this subsection for any qualifying land. A resident transferring eligibility under this subsection may not receive a license under this subsection for the season for which eligibility was transferred. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license.

The number of licenses issued without charge under this subsection may not exceed the total number of licenses prescribed for each district or unit in the governor’s proclamation. If the number of eligible persons who apply for licenses issued without charge under this subsection exceeds the number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in the governor’s proclamation less any licenses that are otherwise designated to be issued with a charge under this subsection, the licenses to be issued without charge must be issued by lottery as prescribed in the governor’s proclamation. If the number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in the governor’s proclamation exceeds fifty and if the number of applications for these licenses exceeds the number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in the governor’s proclamation, then one-half of the licenses exceeding fifty must be issued by lottery as prescribed in the governor’s proclamation and may not be issued to landowners without charge.

A person who is unable to step from a vehicle without aid of a wheelchair, crutch, brace, or other mechanical support or prosthetic device or who is unable to walk any distance because of a permanent lung, heart, or other internal disease that requires the person to use supplemental oxygen to assist breathing and who receives or obtains, whether issued by lottery or otherwise, a license to hunt deer, is entitled to convert one license to take any sex or species of deer in the unit or subunit for which the license is issued. Notwithstanding any other law or any provision contained in the governor’s proclamation concerning the hunting of deer, a person who is unable to step from a vehicle without aid of a wheelchair, crutch, brace, or other mechanical support or prosthetic device or who is unable to walk any distance because of a permanent lung, heart, or other internal disease that requires the person to use supplemental oxygen to assist breathing is entitled to apply for a license to hunt deer regardless of whether that person received a license to hunt deer in any prior year.

A resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, and has executed a lease for at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land that the resident actively farms or ranches; or a resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate and holds title to at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land, is eligible to submit one application for a license to hunt elk upon filing a signed application describing that land and payment of the fee requirement for a resident big game license. The land must be within a unit open for the hunting of elk. The license must include a legal description of the eligible land described in the completed application and may be used to hunt elk within the district or unit in which the land described in the completed application is located. Upon request, a lessee shall provide proof that the land described in the completed application is leased for agricultural purposes. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license. An individual issued a license under this subsection must be a resident.

If the eligible applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, only one license may be issued, and the license must be issued in the name of an individual shareholder, member, partner, beneficiary, or holder of a life estate.

A resident who is eligible for a license under this subsection may transfer that eligibility for the license to a spouse or legal dependent residing customarily with the resident, but no more than one license may be issued under this subsection for any qualifying land.

The governor’s proclamation may restrict the districts or units for which preferential licenses may be issued under this subsection. The number of licenses issued under this subsection for each designated district or unit for hunting elk may not exceed fifteen percent of the total licenses prescribed in the governor’s proclamation for each district or unit. If the number of applications for licenses to be issued under this subsection in a district or unit exceeds the maximum number of licenses allocated to that district or unit, the licenses to be issued must be issued by weighted lottery as prescribed in the governor’s proclamation. Licenses to hunt elk may not be issued under this subsection when the total number of licenses prescribed in the governor’s proclamation is fewer than twenty.

The director may issue special elk depredation management licenses to landowners in designated areas around Theodore Roosevelt national park upon payment of the fee requirement for a resident big game license. The provisions of this section governing the number of licenses issued for each designated district or unit for hunting elk do not apply to special elk depredation management licenses and a person who receives such a license under this subsection is eligible to apply for a license to hunt elk in future years and is eligible to participate in the raffle under section 20.1-08-04.6.

An individual who has been convicted of illegally taking a moose, elk, or bighorn sheep is not eligible to apply for or receive a license under this subsection.

A resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, and has executed a lease for at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land that the resident actively farms or ranches; or a resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate and holds title to at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land, is eligible to submit one application for a license to hunt moose without charge upon filing a signed application describing that land. The land must be within a unit open for the hunting of moose. The license must include a legal description of the eligible land described in the completed application and may be used to hunt moose only upon that land. Upon request, a lessee shall provide proof that the land described in the completed application is leased for agricultural purposes. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license. An individual issued a license under this subsection must be a resident.

If the eligible applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, only one license may be issued, and the license must be issued in the name of an individual shareholder, member, partner, beneficiary, or holder of a life estate.

A resident who is eligible for a license under this subsection may transfer that eligibility for the license to a spouse or a legal dependent residing customarily with the resident, but no more than one license may be issued under this subsection for any qualifying land. A resident transferring eligibility under this subsection is not eligible to apply for a license to hunt moose in future years but is eligible to participate in the raffle under section 20.1-08-04.2. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license.

The number of licenses issued under this subsection for a district or unit may not exceed fifteen percent of the total licenses prescribed in the governor’s proclamation for that district or unit. If the number of eligible persons who apply for a license under this subsection exceeds the number of licenses available under this subsection, the licenses must be issued by lottery as prescribed in the governor’s proclamation.

A person who receives a license under this subsection and who is successful in harvesting a moose is not eligible to apply for a license to hunt moose in future years but is eligible to participate in the raffle under section 20.1-08-04.2. Notwithstanding this subsection, if a person other than the transferee of license eligibility is unsuccessful in harvesting a moose under this subsection, that person may return the unused license to the department and is eligible to apply for, but not transfer, an additional license to hunt moose in future years. A person who receives a second license under this subsection is not eligible to participate in the raffle under section 20.1-08-04.2. If a person receives a license under this subsection, the person’s spouse, children, and parents living with the person are not eligible to receive a license under this subsection for the district or unit in which the land described in the completed application is located, unless the person has sold or otherwise transferred the person’s rights to the land described in the completed application.

The governor’s proclamation may restrict the area of land within a unit open for the hunting of moose for which a preferential license is issued under this subsection. If the proclamation restricts the area for issuance of preferential licenses, an applicant must own or lease land within the restricted area to be eligible to apply for a license to hunt moose upon payment of the fee required for a resident big game license. The license may be used to hunt moose within the entire unit in which the land described in the completed application is located. A successful applicant from a restricted area may not return an unused license to regain eligibility for a license to hunt moose in future years. An individual who has been convicted of illegally taking a moose, elk, or bighorn sheep is not eligible to apply for or receive a license under this subsection.

The director may issue special moose depredation management licenses to landowners in areas designated by the director upon payment of the fee required for a resident big game license. The provisions of this section governing the number of licenses issued for each designated district or unit for hunting moose do not apply to special moose depredation management licenses. A person receiving a moose depredation management license under this subsection is eligible to apply for a license to hunt moose in future years and is eligible to participate in the raffle under section 20.1-08-04.2.

A person who holds a valid license to hunt deer may hunt the same species and sex of deer, for which that person’s license is valid, on land in an adjoining unit for which that person would be eligible for a gratis deer license under subsection 3.

Fifteen percent of the total mule deer licenses and permits to hunt mule deer made available in the immediately preceding year for the regular gun season must be made available to nonresidents to hunt any deer with bow and arrow.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1975, ch. 209, § 2; 1977, ch. 209, § 1; 1979, ch. 304, § 1; 1983, ch. 271, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 276, § 1; 1987, ch. 275, § 1; 1987, ch. 276, § 1; 1991, ch. 238, § 1; 1991, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 231, § 1; 1993, ch. 232, § 1; 1993, ch. 233, § 2; 1995, ch. 230, § 1; 1997, ch. 212, § 1; 1997, ch. 213, § 1; 1997, ch. 214, § 1; 1997, ch. 215, § 1; 1997, ch. 216, § 1; 1999, ch. 218, § 5; 1999, ch. 220, § 1; 1999, ch. 221, § 1; 2001, ch. 223, § 1; 2003, ch. 199, § 1; 2003, ch. 200, § 1; 2003, ch. 204, § 1; 2005, 218, § 1; 2005, ch. 219, § 1; 2005, ch. 220, § 1; 2009, ch. 204, § 2; 2009, ch. 205, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2011, ch. 175, § 1; 2013, ch. 194, § 1; 2017, ch. 172, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Big game regulations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 20.1-05.

20.1-03-11.1.
Combination license — Director authorized to establish.

The director may establish a combination license consisting of a general game license, resident fishing license, resident small game license, habitat stamp, and fur-bearer license.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

20.1-03-11.2.
Hunting outfitters — White-tailed deer licenses — Fees.

The governor shall make one-half of the antlered white-tailed deer licenses and permits allocated to nonresidents under subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-11, up to a maximum of one hundred licenses, available to hunting outfitters licensed in this state. A hunting outfitter may not purchase or obtain more than five white-tailed deer licenses under this section in any one year. A hunting outfitter shall pay the fee required for a white-tailed deer license sold to outfitters and provided by them to nonresidents for each license purchased under this section. A hunting outfitter may provide to nonresidents, for compensation, big game guiding and outfitting services and one white-tailed deer license per nonresident as provided in this section to hunt white-tailed deer in the manner, at the places, and during the times the governor prescribes by proclamation.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 241, § 2; 1993, ch. 231, § 2; 2001, ch. 224, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 4.

20.1-03-11.3.
Early Canada goose season.

A resident or nonresident may purchase an early Canada goose license to hunt geese during an early season as determined by the governor by proclamation. The governor by proclamation may specify the number of licenses that may be issued and the manner in which the licenses are issued. A nonresident is not required to purchase any other license to hunt Canada geese during an early Canada goose season. A nonresident is not entitled to more than one nonresident early Canada goose season license and still may obtain a nonresident waterfowl hunting license under section 20.1-03-07.1.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 193, § 3.

20.1-03-11.4.
Deer lottery license refund to private land open to sportsmen option.

The director shall provide that each application for a deer lottery license contain the option for an applicant to donate the refund to which an unsuccessful applicant would be entitled to the private land open to sportsmen program. All moneys collected under this section must be placed in the game and fish private land habitat and access improvement fund and allocated to the private land open to sportsmen program.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 166, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

20.1-03-11.5.
Purchase of bonus points awarded for lotteries.

When an application for a license issued by a lottery that accrues bonus points is made by an eligible resident with the intent to forfeit the opportunity to receive that license, the director shall limit that applicant to the purchase of one bonus point for that year for that lottery. The applicant shall pay the same fee as the respective license.

The director shall allocate fees collected under subsection 1 to the private lands open to sportsmen program.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 173, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

20.1-03-12.
Schedule of fees for licenses and permits.

The fees collected under this section for licenses and permits must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the game and fish fund, except aquatic nuisance species fees must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the aquatic nuisance species program fund. Forty-five dollars of each nonresident big game hunting license fee must be used for the private land initiative. The various license and permit fees are as follows:

For a resident, age sixteen and over, small game hunting license, ten dollars.

For a nonresident small game hunting license, one hundred dollars.

For a resident big game hunting license, thirty dollars, except the fee for a licensee under age sixteen is ten dollars, except as provided in a gubernatorial proclamation issued pursuant to section 20.1-08-04.1.

Except for a nonresident who participates on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer licenses remaining after the second lottery for residents under subsection 4 of section 20.1-03-11, for a nonresident big game hunting license, two hundred fifty dollars, and for a nonresident bow license, two hundred fifty dollars, and a nonrefundable five dollar application fee must accompany any lottery license fee under this subsection, except as provided in a gubernatorial proclamation issued pursuant to section 20.1-08-04.1. For a nonresident who participates on the same basis as a resident in a lottery for deer licenses remaining after the second lottery for residents, fifty dollars.

For a resident fur-bearer license, fifteen dollars.

For a resident fishing license, sixteen dollars, except that for a resident sixty-five years or over, a resident totally or permanently disabled, or a resident disabled veteran who has a fifty percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs or has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability ratio to fifty percent, the license fee is five dollars.

For a nonresident fishing license, forty-five dollars.

For a resident husband and wife fishing license, twenty-two dollars.

For a nonresident nongame hunting license, fifteen dollars.

For a resident wild turkey permit, fifteen dollars.

For an annual general game license, three dollars.

For a license to a nonresident buyer or shipper of green furs, or that person’s agent, the amount that the nonresident buyer or shipper of green furs would pay for a nonresident buyer or shipper of green furs license or comparable license in that person’s state of residence, or fifty dollars, whichever is greater.

For a license to a resident buyer or shipper of green furs, eight dollars for each place of business maintained by that person within this state.

For a license to a resident traveling agent, buyer, or shipper of green furs, twenty dollars.

For an annual license to practice taxidermy, twenty-five dollars.

For a permit to ship, by a person having a resident hunting license, during the respective open seasons, not to exceed in any one season twenty-five game birds, to points within this state other than that person’s home or to points outside this state, three dollars.

For a permit to make collections of protected birds and animals for scientific purposes, ten dollars.

For a motorboat certificate of number and license: Each motorboat under sixteen feet [4.88 meters] in length, and all canoes, regardless of length, powered by a motor, eighteen dollars. Each motorboat sixteen feet [4.88 meters] in length and over but shorter than twenty feet [6.1 meters] in length, excluding canoes, thirty-six dollars. Each motorboat twenty feet [6.1 meters] in length or over excluding canoes, forty-five dollars.

For the taking of undesirable fish from the waters of this state pursuant to section 20.1-06-05, fifteen dollars for each hoop-net or trap, and fifteen dollars for each seine of fifty feet [15.24 meters] or any fraction thereof.

For a resident paddlefish tag annual license, ten dollars per tag.

For a nonresident paddlefish tag annual license, twenty-five dollars and fifty cents per tag.

For an annual resident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, fifty dollars.

For an annual license to sell minnows or other live bait at retail, fifteen dollars, except the fee is seventy-five dollars if white suckers are sold.

For an annual license to operate a private fish hatchery, seventy-five dollars.

For a resident commercial frog license, fifty dollars.

For a nonresident commercial frog license, two hundred dollars.

For a resident frog license, three dollars.

For a resident husband and wife frog license, five dollars.

For a shooting preserve operating permit, one hundred dollars, plus thirty cents per acre [.40 hectare] for each acre [.40 hectare].

For a nonresident waterfowl hunting license, one hundred dollars.

For a nonresident husband and wife fishing license, sixty dollars.

For a nonresident short-term three-day fishing license, twenty-five dollars.

For a nonresident fur-bearer and nongame hunting license, forty dollars.

For a combination license, fifty dollars.

For a white-tailed deer license sold to certified guides or outfitters and provided by them to nonresidents, two hundred fifty dollars.

For a resident swan license, ten dollars.

For a nonresident swan license, thirty dollars.

For a resident sandhill crane license, ten dollars.

For a nonresident sandhill crane license, thirty dollars.

For a resident commercial clam license, one hundred dollars.

For a nonresident commercial clam license, one thousand dollars.

For a commercial clam dealer’s permit, two thousand dollars. In addition, the applicant shall submit to the director a surety bond in the sum of two thousand dollars.

For an annual class B nonresident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, two hundred fifty dollars.

For a bighorn sheep license issued to a nonresident, five hundred dollars.

For a nonresident reciprocal trapping license, three hundred fifty dollars.

For a nonresident spring white goose license, fifty dollars.

For a resident certificate fee, one dollar, and for a nonresident certificate fee, two dollars. An agent may not charge a service fee for issuing a resident or nonresident certificate fee.

For a nonresident short-term ten-day fishing license, thirty-five dollars.

For a nonresident wild turkey permit, eighty dollars.

For a statewide nonresident waterfowl hunting license, one hundred fifty dollars.

For an annual class A nonresident license to sell minnows or other live bait at wholesale, five hundred dollars.

For a resident early Canada goose season license, five dollars.

For a nonresident early Canada goose season license, fifty dollars.

For a resident disabled veteran combined general game, habitat stamp, small game, and fur-bearer license, three dollars.

For each motorboat licensed in this state, an aquatic nuisance species fee of fifteen dollars valid concurrent with motorboat licensure.

For each motorboat operated on waters of this state and not licensed in this state, an aquatic nuisance species fee of fifteen dollars for the calendar year in which it is paid.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1973, ch. 205, § 3; 1975, ch. 210, § 3; 1977, ch. 207, § 4; 1977, ch. 208, § 2; 1979, ch. 302, §§ 2, 3; 1979, ch. 305, § 1; 1979, ch. 306, § 1; 1981, ch. 260, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 270, § 2; 1983, ch. 272, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 277, § 1; 1987, ch. 277, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 21, § 5; 1989, ch. 281, § 2; 1989, ch. 283, § 1; 1991, ch. 232, § 7; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 1; 1991, ch. 242, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 1; 1993, ch. 12, § 6; 1993, ch. 227, § 3; 1993, ch. 229, § 2; 1993, ch. 229, § 3; 1993, ch. 234, § 1; 1995, ch. 228, § 3; 1995, ch. 231, § 1; 1995, ch. 232, §§ 1, 2; 1997, ch. 210, § 3; 1999, ch. 218, § 6; 2001, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 224, § 2; 2003, ch. 197, §§ 4, 5; 2003, ch. 200, § 2; 2003, ch. 201, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 5; 2005, ch. 207, § 5; 2005, ch. 215, § 2; 2005, ch. 217, § 2; 2005, ch. 222, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 224, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 227, § 1; 2007, ch. 219, § 1; 2013, ch. 193, §§ 4, 5; 2013, ch. 195, § 1; 2013, ch. 196, § 1; 2017, ch. 174, § 1, effective April 12, 2017; 2019, ch. 198, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Hunting and fishing license fees to be used only for departmental programs and administration, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-02-17.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Prohibiting, Limiting, or Regulating Fishing or Hunting in State by Nonresidents, 31 A.L.R.6th 523.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Commerce Clause and Privileges and Immunities Clause: Eighth Circuit Court of Appeals Upholds North Dakota’s Nonresident Hunting Regulations, Reaffirming States’ Rights to Regulate Wildlife Resources Within Their Borders, 83 N.D. L. Rev. 1029 (2007).

20.1-03-12.1.
Habitat restoration stamp required — Use of revenue — Land purchases not allowed.

Except for licenses issued under section 20.1-03-07.3, a habitat restoration stamp is required for every resident and nonresident general game license for which a stamp fee of seventeen dollars must be charged. The habitat restoration stamp fee is in addition to the annual general game license fee charged under section 20.1-03-12. Land may not be purchased with habitat restoration stamp moneys. All moneys generated by habitat restoration stamp fees must be placed in the game and fish private land habitat and access improvement fund with eight dollars of the fee allocated to the private land open to sportsmen program.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 261, § 1; 1987, ch. 278, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 37; 1995, ch. 54, § 13; 1997, ch. 210, § 4; 1999, ch. 218, § 7; 2003, ch. 197, § 6; 2013, ch. 195, § 2.

20.1-03-12.2.
Hunting license and permit application fees.

Each resident applying for a license or permit to hunt elk, moose, or bighorn sheep under this chapter must be assessed a nonrefundable application fee of five dollars for each license or permit application in addition to the fee charged for the issuance of the license or permit under this chapter. Each nonresident applying for a license or permit to hunt bighorn sheep under this chapter must be assessed a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars in addition to the fee charged for the issuance of a license or permit to hunt bighorn sheep under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 278, § 2; 1991, ch. 242, § 2; 1993, ch. 229, § 4; 1993, ch. 234, § 2; 2013, ch. 195, § 3.

20.1-03-12.3.
Fishing, combination, and waterfowl license surcharge.

The director shall establish a surcharge of two dollars on each resident fishing license and combination license except for the resident sixty-five years of age or older license, permanently or totally disabled license, or a disabled veteran license as defined in subsection 6 of section 20.1-03-12. The director also shall establish a surcharge of three dollars on each nonresident fishing license and each nonresident waterfowl hunting license issued under section 20.1-03-12. The collected surcharge fees must be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the aquatic nuisance species program fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 198, § 4, effective April 1, 2020.

20.1-03-13.
Stocking and propagation of upland game.

The department shall allocate not less than fifty thousand dollars biennially, from moneys collected under section 20.1-03-12, to the stocking and propagation of upland game.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

20.1-03-14.
Practicing taxidermy for pay without a license unlawful.

No person may practice taxidermy for pay in this state without a taxidermist’s license. Each violation of this section is a distinct and separate offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10.

20.1-03-15.
Taxidermist’s license — Who to issue.

The director shall issue an annual license to practice taxidermy upon payment of the appropriate license fee.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 38.

20.1-03-16.
Records required of licensed taxidermists — Contents — Inspection of records and unmounted specimens by game officials — Penalty.

Each person having a license to practice taxidermy shall keep a record showing the name of every person who furnished the licensee with a green or unmounted specimen and the species of each specimen. The licensee, upon request, shall exhibit the record and all unmounted specimens in the licensee’s possession to the director, the deputy director, or any bonded game warden. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 noncriminal offense.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1975, ch. 106, § 200; 1985, ch. 272, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 39.

20.1-03-17.
Issuance of licenses — Who to issue — Disposition of proceeds.

All hunting, fur-bearer, fishing, and taxidermists’ licenses must be issued by the director, deputy director, and bonded game wardens. The deputy director and each bonded game warden shall send the director all license fees.

Upon request, the director may appoint the person making the request an agent to distribute hunting and fishing licenses. The director may provide licenses to agents located outside this state if there are no agents located a reasonable distance within this state where nonresidents may obtain licenses. Upon request, the director may appoint the county auditor of any county as an agent to distribute hunting and fishing licenses. The director may require an agent to show evidence of adequate financial security before the agent is appointed. Adequate financial security may be evidenced by a letter of credit, cash deposit, or bond. Agents may be bonded through the state bonding fund. An agent may charge a purchaser up to three percent of the total license fee excluding the certificate fee. The agent shall return the remainder of the license fees to the director at least once each month. Notwithstanding section 26.1-21-11, if a claim against the state bonding fund is not filed within sixty days of the expiration of the reporting period provided in this section, the claim is waived. Deposits are to be accompanied by a report showing the amounts received from the sale of each type of license, the amount retained, and the net amounts deposited. The director shall deposit all license fees received with the state treasurer to be credited to the game and fish fund. Each agent appointed to distribute hunting and fishing licenses shall implement a computerized online licensing system approved by the department. The agent is responsible for any equipment, supplies, and technical support associated with selling licenses online.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1973, ch. 208, § 1; 1983, ch. 273, § 1; 1983, ch. 274, § 1; 1989, ch. 284, § 1; 1989, ch. 285, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 40; 1997, ch. 217, § 1; 1999, ch. 222, § 1; 2001, ch. 225, § 1; 2013, ch. 197, § 1; 2015, ch. 177, § 1, effective April 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 175, § 1, effective March 13, 2017.

Cross-References.

Hunting and fishing license fees to be used only for departmental programs and administration, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-02-17.

Suspension of hunting or fishing privileges, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-26.

20.1-03-18.
Agents to file certain licenses — Game officials may inspect file — Return of unused supplies.

For licenses not issued through the computerized online licensing system, each agent appointed to distribute hunting and fishing licenses shall keep on file a record of each license received from the director. These licenses may be inspected at any time by the director or the director’s duly authorized deputies and wardens. Each agent shall return to the director all unused or mutilated licenses and tags within thirty days after the close of the season for which the license was valid.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1991, ch. 231, § 41; 2015, ch. 177, § 2, effective April 1, 2016.

20.1-03-19.
Remittances by agents to the director.

At the beginning of each month, the director shall provide each agent appointed to distribute hunting and fishing licenses a statement reporting the agent’s license sales for the previous month. By the fifteenth of each month, the agent shall remit to the director the funds collected for license sales for the preceding month.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1989, ch. 286, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 42; 2015, ch. 177, § 3, effective April 1, 2016.

20.1-03-20.
Bonds of agents applicable to duties imposed by this title.

The official bond of each agent bonded through the state bonding fund and appointed by the director to distribute hunting and fishing licenses or stamps applies to all duties required of agents under this title, including the liability for all moneys required to be collected or received by agents under this title for the issuance of licenses.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 10; 1989, ch. 285, § 2; 2015, ch. 177, § 4, effective April 1, 2016.

Cross-References.

Bonds of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

Bonds of county officers, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-06.